District of Columbia statutes.
31-5512

Tax exemption.

The Association shall be exempt from payment of all fees and all taxes levied by the District, except taxes levied on real or personal property.

Oct. 21, 1993, D.C. Law 10-51, § 13, 40 DCR 6120
1981 Ed., § 35-3912.